New Jersey, session 221, S2679.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Any party in a case who is limited English proficient and utilizes translating services in court proceedings shall be entitled to the assistance of a licensed social worker who speaks the partys language to provide or translate any information needed by the party to navigate the court system. 2.  The Commissioner of Human Services shall prepare and provide to the Administrative Director of the Courts a list of licensed social workers who are available to serve as translators.  The director shall develop a registry of approved licensed social workers for the use of the courts. 3.    The director shall establish directives, guidelines, or standards to implement the purposes of this act. 4.  This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment.